Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-2508
Grantees; duties.

Grantees receiving funds pursuant to the Expanded Learning Opportunity Grant Program shall cooperate with evaluators and supervise the administration and collection of student, teacher, parent, and collaboration surveys. Grantees shall also designate a qualified evaluation professional or local evaluation support to ensure data collection, perform annual self-assessments, monitor program progress, and assist in developing local evaluation reports.

Laws 2015, LB519, § 22.